Wyoming, session 2026, HB0012.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
Section 1. W.S. 35-11-2201 through 35-11-2204 are
created to read:

ARTICLE 22
WYOMING CLEAN AIR AND GEOENGINEERING PROHIBITION ACT

35-11-2201. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wyoming
Clean Air and Geoengineering Prohibition Act."

35-11-2202. Legislative findings.

(a) The legislature finds and declares:

(i) Federal agencies, international bodies,
corporations and research institutions have proposed,
studied or in some cases undertaken atmospheric
modification experiments intended to alter weather,
temperature or solar radiation;

(ii) The risks to human health, agriculture,
wildlife and environmental safety from atmospheric
HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
modification experiments and other atmospheric
interventions are not well understood and may have harmful
consequences;

(iii) It is the constitutional duty of state
government to safeguard public health, defend private
property, protect agricultural integrity and assert state
sovereignty over activities conducted within its borders
and above its skies under the tenth amendment of the United
States constitution;

(iv) It is the intent of the legislature to
prohibit atmospheric modification experiments, protect
public health and ensure that the Wyoming department of
environmental quality is empowered to monitor and enforce
air quality protections.

35-11-2203. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Atmospheric contaminant" means any
substance intentionally released into the atmosphere for
HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
the purpose of altering climate, weather or solar
radiation, including but not limited to sulfates, smart
dust, perflouroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances,
genetically modified particles, chaff or radioactive
materials. "Atmospheric contaminant" shall not mean exhaust
from standard aviation using fuels permitted by law,
emissions from agricultural or forestry operations
permitted by law, fire suppression agents, cloud seeding
agents or naturally occurring atmospheric particulates;

(ii) "Geoengineering" means the deliberate
large-scale manipulation of environmental processes to
affect climate conditions;

(iii) "Solar radiation management" means
experimental techniques designed to reduce the amount of
sunlight reaching the earth's surface through reflective
particles or other methods;

(iv) "Stratospheric aerosol injection" means the
release of reflective aerosols into the stratosphere by
aircraft, balloons or other means;

HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
(v) "Weather modification" means any action
intended to change or interfere with the natural
development of cloud forms, precipitation, barometric
pressure, temperature or other atmospheric conditions.
"Weather modification" shall not include cloud seeding;

(vi) "This act" means W.S. 35-11-2201 through
35-11-2204.

35-11-2204. Atmospheric engineering prohibited;
exemptions; enforcement; penalties.

(a) No person shall intentionally inject, release or
disperse by any means any atmospheric contaminant within
Wyoming or the airspace above Wyoming for the purpose of
altering climate, weather or solar radiation.

(b) Prohibited activities under this section include,
but are not limited to:

(i) Solar radiation management;

(ii) Stratospheric aerosol injection;
HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211

(iii) Weather modification;

(iv) Atmospheric polluting interventions,
including dispersal of atmospheric contaminants.

(c) Nothing in this act shall be construed to
prohibit or restrict:

(i) Commercial aviation or satellite operations;

(ii) Weather observation and forecasting;

(iii) Agricultural chemical application
conducted pursuant to law;

(iv) Fire suppression, including the aerial
application of fire retardants or water for wildfire
management;

(v) Snowmaking activities that are authorized
under a lawfully permitted water right;

HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
(vi) Cloud seeding authorized by law;

(vii) Lawful activities expressly authorized by
state environmental laws.

(d) No person shall employ aircraft, drones,
balloons, rockets, artillery, space-based platforms or
ground-based facilities for the intentional release or
dispersal of atmospheric contaminants. This prohibition
shall not apply to aviation, space or ground activities
unrelated to geoengineering, weather modification or solar
radiation management, including commercial, agricultural,
research, cloud seeding, defense or emergency operations
permitted by state law.

(e) The director of the department of environmental
quality shall:

(i) Study whether the atmospheric contaminants
listed in this act pose a threat to human and environmental
health or safety;

HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
(ii) Monitor all aircraft, drones, balloons or
rockets that enter the state's airspace to determine
whether atmospheric contaminants are being dispersed;

(iii) Monitor all space-based platforms above
the state and ground-based facilities within the state to
determine whether atmospheric contaminants are being
dispersed;

(iv) Petition a court of competent jurisdiction
to issue a cease and desist order upon discovery of any
prohibited activity under this act.

(f) The director of the department of environmental
quality shall notify the federal government, other states
or international entities who are committing prohibited
activities under this act and assert that those activities
are unlawful within Wyoming pursuant to this act and the
tenth amendment to the United States constitution.

(g) No person shall retaliate against, harass,
discipline or discriminate against any person on the basis
that the person reported or provided evidence of a
HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
suspected violation of this act. Reports made in good faith
shall not be considered defamatory, frivolous or
retaliatory.

(h) Notwithstanding W.S. 35-11-901, any person who
violates this act:

(i) For a first offense, commits a felony
punishable by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years,
a fine of not less than one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000.00) and not more than five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000.00), or both; or

(ii) For a second or subsequent offense, commits
a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five
(5) years, a fine of not less than five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000.00), or both. Each day where prohibited
activity is conducted constitutes a separate offense.

Section 2. W.S. 9-1-905(a)(ii) and (iii), 9-1-906,
9-1-907(a) and (d), 9-1-908 and 9-1-909 are amended to
read:

HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
9-1-905. Cloud seeding; legislative declarations.

(a) It is hereby declared that:

(ii) Although little is known regarding
artificial weather modification, research and
experimentation regarding cloud seeding shall be
encouraged;

(iii) Although the ultimate use of modification
cloud seeding methods is speculative, the application of
such methods should have proper safeguards and provide
sufficient data to protect life, property and public
interest.

9-1-906. Duty of state engineer to gather information
relative to cloud seeding in state.

The state engineer shall procure, compile and evaluate
information relative to weather modification cloud seeding
experiments and activities within the state boundaries. The
term "weather modification" means attempting to change or
HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
control any of the weather phenomena by chemical,
mechanical or physical methods.

9-1-907. Cloud seeding; permit required; issuance;
duration; fee; report of activities; penalties for
noncompliance.

(a) It is unlawful for anyone to engage in weather
modification cloud seeding activities except by permit
prescribed and issued by the state engineer.

(d) Any person engaging in a weather modification
cloud seeding experiment without a permit is guilty of a
misdemeanor and upon conviction is subject to a fine not to
exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment
for not more than ninety (90) days.

9-1-908. Cloud seeding; authority to receive and
expend funds; purposes.

The state engineer is authorized to receive in the name of
the state any funds offered or available from any source,
and to expend such funds for the expenses of administering
HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
this act and for the encouragement of experimentation in
weather modification cloud seeding by the University of
Wyoming or any other appropriate state or public agency,
either by direct grant, by contract or other cooperative
means.

9-1-909. Cloud seeding; state not liable for
activities of private persons or groups.

Nothing in W.S. 9-1-905 through 9-1-909 shall be construed
to impose or accept any liability or responsibility on the
part of the state, the board, or any state officials or
employees, for any weather modification or cloud seeding
activities of any private person or group, nor to affect in
any way any contractual, tortious, or other legal rights,
duties or liabilities between any private persons or
groups.

Section 3.

(a) The department of environmental quality is
authorized up to two (2) full-time positions for the period
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028 for the
HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
purposes of implementing this act. It is the intent of the
legislature that the department of environmental quality
include these full-time positions in its standard budget
for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

(b) There is appropriated five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000.00) from the general fund to the
department of environmental quality to be expended only for
the purpose of funding the positions authorized in
subsection (a) of this section. This appropriation shall
not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and
any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation be included in the standard budget for the
department of environmental quality for the immediately
succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 4. The department of environmental quality
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0012

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0211
Section 5. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0012